Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20147-210
Commission on Public Advocacy; identify
designated legal profession shortage areas; considerations.

The Commission on
Public Advocacy shall periodically determine and identify designated legal
profession shortage areas within Nebraska. The board shall develop and recommend
to the commission legal profession shortage areas. In making such recommendations,
the board shall consider, after consultation with other appropriate agencies
concerned with legal and rural services and with appropriate professional
organizations, factors including, but not limited to:

(1) The latest
reliable statistical data available regarding the number of attorneys practicing
in an area and the population served by such attorneys;

(2) Distances
between client populations and attorney locations;

(3) Particular local needs
for legal services;

(4) Capacity of local attorneys providing services and scope of
practice being provided; and

(5) Past and future demographic trends in
an area.

Laws 2014, LB907, § 6.
July 18, 2014